Utah statutes.
78B-7-202.   Petition -- Ex parte determination -- Guardian ad litem --
Referral to division.
(1)  Any interested person may file a petition for a protective order on
behalf of a child who is being abused or is in imminent danger of being
abused.  The petitioner shall first make a referral to the division.
(2)  Upon the filing of a petition, the clerk of the court shall:
(a)  review the records of the juvenile court, the district court, and the
management information system of the division to find any petitions, orders,
or investigations related to the child or the parties to the case;
(b)  request the records of any law enforcement agency identified by the
petitioner as having investigated abuse of the child; and
(c)  identify and obtain any other background information that may be of
assistance to the court.
(3)  Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall immediately determine,
based on the evidence and information presented, whether the minor is being
abused or is in imminent danger of being abused.  If so, the court shall enter
an ex parte child protective order.
(4)  The court may appoint an attorney guardian ad litem for the child who is
the subject of the petition.
